Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1171.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 415(a)(2) and (d) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended to read:Section 415. Wine Expanded Permits.--(a) * * *(2) Nothing in this section may affect the ability of an existing licensee to operate within the scope of its current 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 license as authorized by this act.[, except that no sales of wine for off-premises consumption may take place by a wine expanded permit holder after eleven o'clock postmeridian of any day until the licensee's permitted hours of operation under section 406 of the next day, including Sundays if the licensee has a permit authorized under section 406(a)(3).]* * *(d) A wine expanded permit holder may sell for off-premises consumption, in a single transaction, up to three thousand (3,000) milliliters of wine. The sales may occur at any time during which the wine expanded permit holder is otherwise authorized to sell alcohol for on-premises consumption.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1171PN1308 - 2 - 1234567891011121314